Nevada, session 83, AB344.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 425 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Judicial officer” means a person who is appointed by a court
pursuant to NRS 425.381 to act as a judicial officer of the court.
Sec. 2. NRS 425.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.260 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 425.270 to 425.335,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 425.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.295 “Debt” means the amount of money owed as support
for a dependent child pursuant to:
1. An order of a court of competent jurisdiction of this or any
other state; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
2. A recommendation entered by the [master] judicial officer
pursuant to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive, and approved by
the district court.
Sec. 4. NRS 425.381 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.381 1. A [master] judicial officer must be appointed as
set forth in this section [.] and NRS 3.405.
2. The district judges of:
(a) The Family Court of the Second Judicial District shall
appoint the [masters] judicial officers for that District, and shall
establish the qualifications and duties of those [masters;] judicial
officers; and
(b) The Family Court of the Eighth Judicial District shall
appoint the [masters] judicial officers for that District, and shall
establish the qualifications and duties of those [masters.] judicial
officers.
3. The district judges of the remaining judicial districts shall
appoint the [masters] judicial officers for those districts, and shall
establish the qualifications and duties of those [masters.] judicial
officers.
4. A [master] judicial officer serves at the pleasure of the
district judges who appointed the [master.] judicial officer.
Sec. 5. NRS 425.382 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.382 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.346,
the Chief may proceed pursuant to NRS 425.3822 to 425.3852,
inclusive, after:
(a) Payment of public assistance by the Division; or
(b) Receipt of a request for services to carry out the Program.
2. Subject to approval by the district court pursuant to NRS
425.3844, a [master] judicial officer may:
(a) Take any action authorized pursuant to chapter 130 of NRS,
including any of the actions described in subsection 2 of
NRS 130.305.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in chapter 130 of NRS and
NRS 425.346:
(1) Issue and enforce an order for the support of a dependent
child, and modify or adjust such an order in accordance with
NRS 125B.145;
(2) Require coverage for health care of a dependent child;
(3) Establish paternity;
(4) Order a responsible parent to comply with an order for
the support of a dependent child, specifying the amount and the
manner of compliance;
(5) Order the withholding of income;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(6) Determine the amount of any arrearages and specify a
method of payment;
(7) Enforce orders by civil or criminal contempt, or both;
(8) Set aside property for satisfaction of an order for the
support of a dependent child;
(9) Place liens and order execution on the property of the
responsible parent;
(10) Order a responsible parent to keep the [master] judicial
officer informed of the responsible parent’s current residential
address, telephone number, employer, address of employment and
telephone number at the place of employment;
(11) Issue a bench warrant for a responsible parent who has
failed after proper notice to appear at a hearing ordered by the
[master] judicial officer and enter the bench warrant in any local
and state computer system for criminal warrants;
(12) Order the responsible parent to seek appropriate
employment by specified methods;
(13) Order the responsible parent to participate in a program
intended to resolve issues that prevent the responsible parent from
obtaining employment, including, without limitation, a program for
the treatment of substance use disorders or a program to address
mental health issues;
(14) Upon the request of the Division, require a responsible
parent to:
(I) Pay any support owed in accordance with a plan
approved by the Division; or
(II) Participate in such work activities, as that term is
defined in 42 U.S.C. § 607(d), as the Division deems appropriate;
(15) Award reasonable attorney’s fees and other fees and
costs; and
(16) Grant any other available remedy.
Sec. 6. NRS 425.3824 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3824 1. The notice and finding of financial responsibility
issued pursuant to NRS 425.3822 must include:
(a) The name of the person who has physical custody of the
dependent child and the name of the child for whom support is to be
paid.
(b) A statement of the monthly support for which the parent is
responsible.
(c) A statement of the amount of arrearages sought, if any.
(d) A statement that the parent may be required to provide
coverage for the health care of the dependent child when coverage is
available to the parent at a reasonable cost.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(e) A statement of any requirements the Division will request
pursuant to subparagraph (14) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
NRS 425.382, regarding a plan for the payment of support by the
parent or the participation of the parent in work activities.
(f) A statement that if the parent desires to discuss the amount of
support or coverage for health care that the parent should be
required to pay or provide, the parent may contact the office that
sent the notice within 20 days after the date of receipt of service and
request a conference for negotiation.
(g) A statement that if the parent objects to any part of the notice
and finding of financial responsibility, the parent must send to the
office that issued the notice a written response within 20 days after
the date of receipt of service that sets forth any objections and
requests a hearing.
(h) A statement that if a response is received within the specified
period, the parent is entitled to a hearing and that if a written
response is not received within the specified period, the [master]
judicial officer may enter a recommendation for support of a
dependent child in accordance with the notice and finding of
financial responsibility.
(i) A statement that as soon as the recommendation is entered
and approved by the court, the property of the parent is subject to an
attachment or other procedure for collection, including, but not
limited to, withholding of wages, garnishment, liens and execution
on liens.
(j) A reference to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive.
(k) A statement that the parent is responsible for notifying the
office of any change of address or employment.
(l) A statement that if the parent has any questions, the parent
may contact the office or consult an attorney.
(m) Such other information as the Chief finds appropriate.
2. The statement of the monthly support required pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 must be computed in accordance with
the guidelines established by the Administrator pursuant to
NRS 425.620.
3. After a conference for negotiation is held pursuant to
paragraph (f) of subsection 1, if an agreement is not reached on the
monthly support to be paid or the coverage to be provided, a hearing
must be held pursuant to NRS 425.3832 and notice of the hearing
must be sent to the parent by regular mail at the last known address
of the parent or to the last known address of the attorney for the
parent.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Sec. 7. NRS 425.3826 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3826 If the paternity of the dependent child has not been
legally established and a notice and finding of financial
responsibility is to be served on the alleged parent, the notice must
include:
1. The information required by NRS 425.3824.
2. An allegation that the person is the parent of the dependent
child.
3. The name of the other parent of the child.
4. The date of birth of the child.
5. The probable period during which conception took place.
6. A statement that if the alleged parent does not send to the
office issuing the notice and finding of financial responsibility a
written response that denies paternity and requests a hearing, within
the specified period, the [master,] judicial officer, without further
notice to the alleged parent, may enter a recommendation that
declares and establishes the person as the legal parent of the child.
Sec. 8. NRS 425.3828 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3828 1. If a written response setting forth objections and
requesting a hearing is received by the office issuing the notice and
finding of financial responsibility within the specified period, a
hearing must be held pursuant to NRS 425.3832 and notice of the
hearing must be sent to the parent by regular mail.
2. If a written response and request for hearing is not received
by the office issuing the notice and finding of financial
responsibility within the specified period, the [master] judicial
officer may enter a recommendation for the support of a dependent
child in accordance with the notice and shall:
(a) Include in that recommendation:
(1) If the paternity of the dependent child is established by
the recommendation, a declaration of that fact.
(2) The amount of monthly support to be paid, including
directions concerning the manner of payment.
(3) The amount of arrearages owed.
(4) Whether coverage for health care must be provided for
the dependent child.
(5) Any requirements to be imposed pursuant to
subparagraph (14) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 425.382
regarding a plan for the payment of support by the parent or the
participation of the parent in work activities.
(6) The names of the parents or legal guardians of the child.
(7) The name of the person to whom, and the name and date
of birth of the dependent child for whom, support is to be paid.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(8) A statement that the property of the parent is subject to an
attachment or other procedure for collection, including, but not
limited to, withholding of wages, garnishment, liens and execution
on liens.
(9) A statement that objections to the recommendation may
be filed with the district court and served upon the other party
within 10 days after receipt of the recommendation.
(b) Ensure that the social security numbers of the parents or
legal guardians of the child and the person to whom support is to be
paid are provided to the enforcing authority.
3. The parent must be sent a copy of the recommendation for
the support of a dependent child by regular mail addressed to the
last known address of the parent, or if applicable, the last known
address of the attorney for the parent.
4. The recommendation for the support of a dependent child is
final upon approval by the district court pursuant to NRS 425.3844.
The Chief may take action to enforce and collect upon the order of
the court approving the recommendation, including arrearages, from
the date of the approval of the recommendation.
5. If a written response and request for hearing is not received
by the office issuing the notice and finding of financial
responsibility within the specified period, and the [master] judicial
officer enters a recommendation for the support of a dependent
child, the court may grant relief from the recommendation on the
grounds set forth in paragraph (b) of Rule 60 of the Nevada Rules of
Civil Procedure.
Sec. 9. NRS 425.383 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.383 1. After the entry of a recommendation for the
support of a dependent child by the [master] judicial officer that has
been approved by the district court pursuant to NRS 425.3844, or
after entry of an order for the support of a dependent child by a
district court regarding which the Chief is authorized to proceed
pursuant to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive, the responsible
parent, the person entitled to support or the enforcing authority may
move for the amount of the child support being enforced to be
modified or adjusted in accordance with NRS 125B.145.
2. The motion must:
(a) Be in writing.
(b) Set out the reasons for the modification or adjustment.
(c) State the address of the moving party.
(d) Be served by the moving party upon the responsible parent
or the person entitled to support, as appropriate, by first-class mail
to the last known address of that person.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
3. The moving party shall mail or deliver a copy of the motion
and the original return of service to the Chief.
4. The Chief shall set the matter for a hearing within 30 days
after the date of receipt of the motion unless a stipulated agreement
between the parties is reached. The Chief shall send to the parties
and person with physical custody of the dependent child a notice of
the hearing by first-class mail to the last known address of those
persons.
5. A motion for modification or adjustment requested pursuant
to this section does not prohibit the Chief from enforcing and
collecting upon the existing order for support of a dependent child
unless so ordered by the district court.
6. The only support payments that may be modified or adjusted
pursuant to this section are monthly support payments that:
(a) A court of this state has jurisdiction to modify pursuant to
chapter 130 of NRS; and
(b) Accrue after the moving party serves notice that a motion
has been filed for modification or adjustment.
7. The party requesting the modification or adjustment has the
burden of showing a change of circumstances and good cause for
the modification or adjustment, unless the request is filed in
accordance with subsection 1 of NRS 125B.145.
Sec. 10. NRS 425.3832 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3832 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a
hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive,
must be conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section
by a qualified [master] judicial officer appointed pursuant to
NRS 425.381.
2. Subpoenas may be issued by:
(a) The [master.] judicial officer.
(b) The attorney of record for the office.
 Obedience to the subpoena may be compelled in the same
manner as provided in chapter 22 of NRS. A witness appearing
pursuant to a subpoena, other than a party or an officer or employee
of the Chief, is entitled to receive the fees and payment for mileage
prescribed for a witness in a civil action.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the [master]
judicial officer need not observe strict rules of evidence but shall
apply those rules of evidence prescribed in NRS 233B.123.
4. The affidavit of any party who resides outside of the judicial
district is admissible as evidence regarding the duty of support, any
arrearages and the establishment of paternity. The [master] judicial
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
officer may continue the hearing to allow procedures for discovery
regarding any matter set forth in the affidavit.
5. The physical presence of a person seeking the establishment,
enforcement, modification or adjustment of an order for the support
of a dependent child or the establishment of paternity is not
required.
6. A verified petition, an affidavit, a document substantially
complying with federally mandated forms and a document
incorporated by reference in any of them, not excluded under NRS
51.065 if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given under
oath by a party or witness residing outside of the judicial district.
7. A copy of the record of payments for the support of a
dependent child, certified as a true copy of the original by the
custodian of the record, may be forwarded to the [master.] judicial
officer. The copy is evidence of facts asserted therein and is
admissible to show whether payments were made.
8. Copies of bills for testing for paternity, and for prenatal and
postnatal health care of the mother and child, furnished to the
adverse party at least 20 days before the hearing, are admissible in
evidence to prove the amount of the charges billed and that the
charges were reasonable, necessary and customary.
9. Documentary evidence transmitted from outside of the
judicial district by telephone, telecopier or other means that do not
provide an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on
an objection based on the means of transmission.
10. The [master] judicial officer may:
(a) Conduct a hearing by telephone, audiovisual means or other
electronic means outside of the judicial district in which the [master]
judicial officer is appointed.
(b) Permit a party or witness residing outside of the judicial
district to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means
or other electronic means before a designated court or at another
location outside of the judicial district.
 The [master] judicial officer shall cooperate with courts outside
of the judicial district in designating an appropriate location for the
hearing, deposition or testimony.
11. If a party called to testify at a hearing refuses to answer a
question on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating,
the [master] judicial officer may draw an adverse inference from the
refusal.
12. A privilege against the disclosure of communications
between a married couple does not apply.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
13. The defense of immunity based on the relationship of a
married couple or parent and child does not apply.
Sec. 11. NRS 425.3834 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3834 1. Upon issuance by a district court of an order
approving a recommendation entered by a [master] judicial officer
pursuant to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive, the Chief shall
enforce and collect upon the order, including arrearages.
2. A recommendation entered by a [master] judicial officer
pursuant to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive, is final upon
approval by the district court pursuant to NRS 425.3844. Upon such
approval, the recommendation is in full force and effect while any
judicial review is pending unless the recommendation is stayed by
the district court.
3. The district court may review a recommendation entered by
a [master] judicial officer pursuant to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852,
inclusive. If a review is conducted, the district court:
(a) Shall, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), review
the recommendation on the record of the case before the [master.]
judicial officer.
(b) May, in extraordinary circumstances as determined by the
district court, grant a trial de novo.
Sec. 12. NRS 425.3836 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3836 1. After the issuance of an order for the support of
a dependent child by a court, the Chief may issue a notice of intent
to enforce the order. The notice must be served upon the responsible
parent in the manner prescribed for service of summons in a civil
action or mailed to the responsible parent by certified mail,
restricted delivery, with return receipt requested.
2. The notice must include:
(a) The names of the person to whom support is to be paid and
the dependent child for whom support is to be paid.
(b) The amount of monthly support the responsible parent is
required to pay by the order for support.
(c) A statement of the arrearages owed pursuant to the order for
support.
(d) A demand that the responsible parent make full payment to
the enforcing authority within 14 days after the receipt or service of
the notice.
(e) A statement that the responsible parent may be required to
provide coverage for the health care of the dependent child when
coverage is available to the parent at a reasonable cost.
(f) A statement of any requirements the Division will request
pursuant to subparagraph (14) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
NRS 425.382 regarding a plan for the payment of support by the
responsible parent or the participation of the responsible parent in
work activities.
(g) A statement that if the responsible parent objects to any part
of the notice of intent to enforce the order, the responsible parent
must send to the office that issued the notice a written response
within 14 days after the date of receipt of service that sets forth any
objections and includes a request for a hearing.
(h) A statement that if full payment is not received within 14
days or a hearing has not been requested in the manner provided in
paragraph (g), the Chief is entitled to enforce the order and that the
property of the responsible parent is subject to an attachment or
other procedure for collection, including, but not limited to,
withholding of wages, garnishment, liens and execution on liens.
(i) A reference to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive.
(j) A statement that the responsible parent is responsible for
notifying the office of any change of address or employment.
(k) A statement that if the responsible parent has any questions,
the responsible parent may contact the appropriate office or consult
an attorney.
(l) Such other information as the Chief finds appropriate.
3. If a written response setting forth objections and requesting
a hearing is received within the specified period by the office
issuing the notice of intent to enforce the order, a hearing must be
held pursuant to NRS 425.3832 and notice of the hearing must be
sent to the responsible parent by regular mail. If a written response
and request for hearing is not received within the specified period by
the office issuing the notice, the [master] judicial officer may enter
a recommendation for the support of a dependent child in
accordance with the notice and shall include in that
recommendation:
(a) The amount of monthly support to be enforced, including
directions concerning the manner of payment.
(b) The amount of arrearages owed and the manner of payment.
(c) Whether coverage for health care must be provided for the
dependent child.
(d) Any requirements to be imposed pursuant to subparagraph
(14) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 425.382 regarding a
plan for the payment of support by the parent or the participation of
the parent in work activities.
(e) A statement that the property of the parent is subject to an
attachment or other procedure for collection, including, but not
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
limited to, the withholding of wages, garnishment, liens and
execution on liens.
4. After the district court approves the recommendation for the
support of a dependent child, the recommendation is final. The
Chief may take action to enforce and collect upon the order of the
court approving the recommendation, including arrearages, from the
date of the approval of the recommendation.
5. This section does not prevent the Chief from using other
available remedies for the enforcement of an obligation for the
support of a dependent child at any time.
6. The [master] judicial officer may hold a hearing to enforce a
recommendation for the support of a dependent child after the
recommendation has been entered and approved by the district court
pursuant to NRS 425.3844. The [master] judicial officer may enter
a finding that the parent has not complied with the order of the court
and may recommend to the district court that the parent be held in
contempt of court. The finding and recommendation is effective
upon review and approval of the district court.
Sec. 13. NRS 425.3838 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3838 1. The [master] judicial officer may enter a
recommendation establishing the paternity of a child during a
proceeding concerning the support of a dependent child pursuant to
NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive, if both parents sign affidavits
or other sworn statements that paternity has not been legally
established and that the male parent is the father of the child.
2. If there is only one alleged father and he does not file a
response that denies paternity and requests a hearing within the
period allowed in paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 425.3824,
the [master,] judicial officer, without further notice to the alleged
father, may enter a recommendation in accordance with NRS
425.3828 that declares and establishes the alleged father as the legal
father of the child.
3. Any recommendation entered pursuant to subsection 1 or 2
and approved by the district court establishes legal paternity of the
dependent child for all purposes.
Sec. 14. NRS 425.384 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.384 1. The [master] judicial officer shall order blood
tests or tests for the genetic identification of the child, mother and
alleged father if such tests are not ordered pursuant to NRS 425.490
and:
(a) Paternity is alleged pursuant to NRS 425.3826 and a written
response denying paternity and requesting a hearing is received by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
the Chief within the period allowed in paragraph (g) of subsection 1
of NRS 425.3824;
(b) Any person alleges that more than one person may be the
father of the child and none of the persons alleged to be the father
acknowledges paternity of the child; or
(c) The [master] judicial officer determines that there is a valid
issue concerning the paternity of the child.
 The Division shall pay the costs of any tests conducted pursuant
to this section. If the district court approves a recommendation
establishing the paternity of a child pursuant to NRS 425.3844, the
father shall reimburse the Division for the costs of those tests.
2. If settlement is not made after the [master] judicial officer
examines the results of the blood tests or tests for genetic
identification conducted pursuant to this section or NRS 425.490,
the [master] judicial officer shall make a determination of paternity
based upon the evidence presented to him.
Sec. 15. NRS 425.3841 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3841 Upon the motion of a party in a proceeding to
establish paternity, the [master] judicial officer shall issue a
recommendation for the temporary support of the dependent child
pending the resolution of the proceedings if the [master] judicial
officer determines that there is clear and convincing evidence that
the person to whom the recommendation is issued is the father of
the child.
Sec. 16. NRS 425.3844 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3844 1. A recommendation entered by a [master]
judicial officer pursuant to NRS 425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive,
including a recommendation establishing paternity, must be
furnished to each party or the attorney of the party at the conclusion
of the proceedings or as soon thereafter as possible.
2. Within 10 days after receipt of the recommendation, any
party may file with the district court and serve upon the other parties
a notice of objection to the recommendation. The notice must
include:
(a) A copy of the [master’s] recommendation [;] of the judicial
officer;
(b) The results of any blood tests or tests for genetic
identification examined by the [master;] judicial officer;
(c) A concise statement setting forth the reasons that the party
disagrees with the [master’s] recommendation [,] of the judicial
officer, including any affirmative defenses that must be pleaded
pursuant to the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure;
(d) A statement of the relief requested;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(e) The notice and finding of financial responsibility if the Chief
issued such a notice and finding; and
(f) Any other relevant documents.
3. If, within 10 days after receipt of the recommendation, a
notice of objection is:
(a) Not filed, the recommendation entered by the [master]
judicial officer shall be deemed approved by the district court, and
the clerk of the district court may file the recommendation pursuant
to subsection 7 and judgment may be entered thereon; or
(b) Filed, the district court shall review the matter pursuant to
NRS 425.3834.
4. A party who receives a notice of objection pursuant to
subsection 2 is not required to file an answer to that notice. The
district court shall review each objection contained in the notice.
5. If a notice of objection includes an objection to a
recommendation establishing paternity, the enforcement of any
obligation for the support of the child recommended by the [master]
judicial officer must, upon the filing and service of the notice, be
stayed until the district court rules upon the determination of
paternity. The obligation for the support of the child continues to
accrue during the consideration of the determination of paternity and
must be collected as arrears after the completion of the trial if the
court approves the recommendation of the [master.] judicial officer.
6. If a recommendation entered by a [master,] judicial officer,
including a recommendation establishing paternity, is deemed
approved by the district court pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 and the recommendation modifies or adjusts a previous
order for support issued by any district court in this State, that
district court must be notified of the recommendation by the
[master.] judicial officer.
7. Upon approval by the district court of a recommendation
entered by a [master] judicial officer pursuant to NRS 425.382 to
425.3852, inclusive, including a recommendation establishing
paternity, a copy of the recommendation, with the approval of the
court endorsed thereon, must be filed:
(a) In the office of the clerk of the district court;
(b) If the order of the district court approving the
recommendation of the [master] judicial officer modifies or adjusts
a previous order issued by any district court in this State, with the
original order in the office of the clerk of that district court; and
(c) With any court that conducts a proceeding related thereto
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 130 of NRS.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
8. A district court that approves a recommendation pursuant to
this section shall ensure that, before the recommendation is filed
pursuant to subsection 7, the social security numbers of the parents
or legal guardians of the child are provided to the enforcing
authority.
9. Upon the approval and filing of the recommendation as
provided in subsection 7, the recommendation has the force, effect
and attributes of an order or decree of the district court, including,
but not limited to, enforcement by supplementary proceedings,
contempt of court proceedings, writs of execution, liens and writs of
garnishment.
Sec. 17. NRS 425.3846 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3846 In addition to any other remedy provided by law for
the enforcement of support, if a recommendation for support of a
dependent child has been entered by the [master,] judicial officer,
approved by the district court and filed, the Chief may proceed in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 31A of NRS.
Sec. 18. NRS 425.385 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.385 Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
the [master] judicial officer may certify a proceeding to establish an
order for support of a dependent child or arrearages to the district
court if the issues are complex or beyond the competence of the
[master.] judicial officer. The [master] judicial officer shall enter a
temporary recommendation for support in such cases. The
temporary support must be paid to the enforcing authority and held
until final resolution of the case.
Sec. 19. NRS 425.3855 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.3855 A district court that enters an order pursuant to NRS
425.382 to 425.3852, inclusive, or an order approving a
recommendation for the support of a dependent child made by a
[master] judicial officer shall ensure that the social security
numbers of the parents or legal guardians of the child are provided
to the enforcing authority.
Sec. 20. NRS 425.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.470 1. The Chief shall send a notice by first-class mail to
each responsible parent who is in arrears in any payment for the
support of one or more children required pursuant to an order
enforced by a court in this State. The notice must include a
statement of the amount of the arrearage and the information
prescribed in subsection 2.
2. If the responsible parent does not satisfy the arrearage within
20 days after the responsible parent receives the notice required by
subsection 1, the Chief may, to collect the arrearage owed:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(a) Require the responsible parent to pay monthly the amount
the responsible parent is required to pay pursuant to the order for
support plus an additional amount to satisfy the arrearage; or
(b) Issue a notice of attachment to the financial institutions in
which the assets of the responsible parent are held and attach and
seize such assets as are necessary to satisfy the arrearage.
3. If the Chief proceeds to collect an arrearage pursuant to
subsection 2, the Chief shall notify the responsible parent of that
fact in writing. The notice must be sent by first-class mail.
4. The Chief shall determine the amount of any additional
payment required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2 based
upon the amount of the arrearage owed by the responsible parent
and the ability of the responsible parent to pay.
5. A responsible parent against whom the Division proceeds
pursuant to subsection 2 may, within 20 days after the responsible
parent receives the notice required pursuant to subsection 3, submit
to the Chief a request for a hearing. Before a hearing may be held,
the responsible parent and a representative of the enforcing authority
must meet and make a good faith effort to resolve the matter.
6. If a hearing is requested within the period prescribed in
subsection 5 and the responsible parent and the enforcing authority
meet as required pursuant to subsection 5, the hearing must be held
pursuant to NRS 425.3832 within 20 days after the Chief receives
the request. The [master] judicial officer shall notify the responsible
parent of the recommendation or decision of the [master] judicial
officer at the conclusion of the hearing or as soon thereafter as is
practicable.
7. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to
have received a notice 3 days after it is mailed, by first-class mail,
postage prepaid, to that person at the last known address of the
person.
Sec. 21. NRS 425.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.510 1. Each district attorney or other public agency
collecting support for children shall send a notice by first-class mail
to each person who:
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a
proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish or
enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children.
 The notice must include the information set forth in subsection 2
and a copy of the subpoena or warrant or a statement of the amount
of the arrearage.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
2. If the person does not, within 30 days after the person
receives the notice required by subsection 1:
(a) Comply with the subpoena or warrant;
(b) Satisfy the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560; or
(c) Submit to the district attorney or other public agency a
written request for a hearing,
 the district attorney or other public agency shall report the name
of that person to the Department of Motor Vehicles and to the
Department of Wildlife.
3. Before a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 2 may be
held, the person requesting the hearing and a representative of the
enforcing authority must meet and make a good faith effort to
resolve the matter.
4. If a person requests a hearing within the period prescribed in
subsection 2 and meets with the enforcing authority as required
pursuant to subsection 3, a hearing must be held pursuant to NRS
425.3832. The [master] judicial officer shall notify the person of the
recommendation of the [master] judicial officer at the conclusion of
the hearing or as soon thereafter as is practicable. If the [master]
judicial officer determines that the person has failed to comply with
a subpoena or warrant relating to a proceeding to determine the
paternity of a child or to establish or enforce an obligation for the
support of a child, the [master] judicial officer shall include in
the notice the information set forth in subsection 5. If the [master]
judicial officer determines that the person is in arrears in the
payment for the support of one or more children, the [master]
judicial officer shall include in the notice the information set forth
in subsection 6.
5. If the [master] judicial officer determines that a person who
requested a hearing pursuant to subsection 2 has not complied with a
subpoena or warrant relating to a proceeding to determine the
paternity of a child or to establish or enforce an obligation for the
support of a child and the district court issues an order approving
the recommendation of the [master,] judicial officer, the district
attorney or other public agency shall report the name of that person
to the Department of Motor Vehicles and to the Department of
Wildlife.
6. If the [master] judicial officer determines that a person who
requested a hearing pursuant to subsection 2 is in arrears in the
payment for the support of one or more children, the [master]
judicial officer shall notify the person that if the person does not
immediately agree to enter into a plan for the repayment of the
arrearages that is approved by the district attorney or other public
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
agency, the driver’s license and motorcycle driver’s license of the
person and any license or permit to hunt, fish or trap issued by the
Department of Wildlife to the person pursuant to chapters 502 and
503 of NRS, may be subject to suspension. If the person does not
agree to enter into such a plan and the district court issues an order
approving the recommendation of the [master,] judicial officer, the
district attorney or other public agency shall report the name of that
person to the Department of Motor Vehicles and to the Department
of Wildlife.
7. The district attorney or other public agency shall, within 5
days after the person who has failed to comply with a subpoena or
warrant or is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or
more children complies with the subpoena or warrant or satisfies the
arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560, notify the Department of Motor
Vehicles and the Department of Wildlife that the person has
complied with the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the
arrearage.
8. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to
have received a notice 3 days after it is mailed, by first-class mail,
postage prepaid, to that person at the last known address of the
person.
Sec. 22. NRS 425.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.530 1. Each district attorney or other public agency
collecting support for children shall send a notice by certified mail,
restricted delivery, with return receipt requested to each person who:
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a
proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish,
modify or enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children.
 The notice must include the information set forth in subsections 2
and 4 and a copy of the subpoena or warrant or a statement of the
amount of the arrearage.
2. If the person does not, within 30 days after the person
receives the notice required by subsection 1:
(a) Comply with the subpoena or warrant;
(b) Satisfy the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560; or
(c) Submit to the district attorney or other public agency a
written request for a hearing,
 the district attorney or other public agency shall request in
writing that the [master] judicial officer suspend all professional,
occupational and recreational licenses, certificates and permits
issued to that person, and any state business license issued to that
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
person if he or she is conducting business in this State as a sole
proprietor.
3. Before a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 2 may be
held, the person requesting the hearing and a representative of the
enforcing authority must meet and make a good faith effort to
resolve the matter.
4. If the [master] judicial officer receives from a district
attorney or other public agency a request to suspend the
professional, occupational and recreational licenses, certificates and
permits issued to a person, and any state business license issued to
that person if he or she is conducting business in this State as a sole
proprietor, the [master] judicial officer shall enter a
recommendation determining whether the person:
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a
proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish,
modify or enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children.
 As soon as practicable after the [master] judicial officer enters a
recommendation, the district attorney or other public agency shall
notify the person by first-class mail of the recommendation of the
[master.] judicial officer.
5. If a person requests a hearing within the period prescribed in
subsection 2 and meets with the enforcing authority as required in
subsection 3, a hearing must be held pursuant to NRS 425.3832. The
[master] judicial officer shall notify the person of the
recommendation of the [master] judicial officer at the conclusion of
the hearing or as soon thereafter as is practicable.
6. As used in this section, “professional, occupational and
recreational licenses, certificates and permits” does not include
licenses and permits to hunt, fish or trap issued by the Department
of Wildlife pursuant to chapters 502 and 503 of NRS.
Sec. 23. NRS 425.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.540 1. If a [master] judicial officer enters a
recommendation determining that a person:
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a
proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish or
enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children,
 and the district court issues an order approving the
recommendation of the [master] judicial officer pursuant to NRS
425.3844, the court shall provide a copy of the order to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
Secretary of State and all agencies that issue professional,
occupational or recreational licenses, certificates or permits.
2. A court order issued pursuant to subsection 1 must provide
that if the person named in the order does not, within 30 days after
the date on which the order is issued, submit to any agency that has
issued a professional, occupational or recreational license, certificate
or permit to that person, and to the Secretary of State if he or she
conducts business in this State as a sole proprietor, a letter from the
district attorney or other public agency stating that the person has
complied with the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the arrearage
pursuant to NRS 425.560, the professional, occupational or
recreational licenses issued to the person by that agency, or the state
business license issued to the person to conduct business in this
State as a sole proprietor by the Secretary of State, will be
automatically suspended. Such an order must not apply to a license,
certificate or permit issued by the State Land Registrar if that
license, certificate or permit expires less than 6 months after it is
issued.
3. If a court issues an order pursuant to subsection 1, the
district attorney or other public agency shall send a notice by first-
class mail to the person who is subject to the order. The notice must
include:
(a) If the person has failed to comply with a subpoena or
warrant, a copy of the court order and a copy of the subpoena or
warrant; or
(b) If the person is in arrears in the payment for the support of
one or more children:
(1) A copy of the court order;
(2) A statement of the amount of the arrearage; and
(3) A statement of the action that the person may take to
satisfy the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560.
4. As used in this section, “professional, occupational and
recreational licenses, certificates and permits” does not include
licenses and permits to hunt, fish or trap issued by the Department
of Wildlife pursuant to chapters 502 and 503 of NRS.
Sec. 24. NRS 425.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.610 1. The Committee to Review Child Support
Guidelines is hereby created. The Committee consists of:
(a) The presiding judge of the Family Division of the Second
Judicial District Court or his or her designee;
(b) The presiding judge of the Family Division of the Eighth
Judicial District Court or his or her designee;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(c) One member who is a district court judge or [master]
judicial officer from a judicial district other than the Second or
Eighth Judicial District, appointed by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court;
(d) One member who is a justice or retired justice of the
Supreme Court, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court;
(e) One member who is a district attorney in Clark County,
appointed by the governing body of the Nevada District Attorneys
Association, or his or her designee;
(f) One member who is a district attorney in Washoe County,
appointed by the governing body of the Nevada District Attorneys
Association, or his or her designee;
(g) One member who is a district attorney in a county other than
Clark or Washoe County, appointed by the governing body of the
Nevada District Attorneys Association, or his or her designee;
(h) Two members who are members of the Family Law Section
of the State Bar of Nevada, appointed by the Executive Council of
the Family Law Section;
(i) One member who is an employee of the Division, appointed
by the Administrator;
(j) One member who has expertise in economics and child
support, appointed by the Administrator;
(k) Two members who are Senators, one of whom is appointed
by the Majority Leader of the Senate and one of whom is appointed
by the Minority Leader of the Senate; and
(l) Two members who are members of the Assembly, one of
whom is appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one of
whom is appointed by the Minority Leader of the Assembly.
 If any association listed in this subsection ceases to exist, the
appointment required by this subsection must be made by the
association’s successor in interest or, if there is no successor in
interest, by the Governor.
2. Each appointed member serves a term of 4 years. Members
may be reappointed for additional terms of 4 years in the same
manner as the original appointments. Any vacancy occurring in the
membership of the Committee must be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment not later than 30 days after the vacancy
occurs.
3. At the first regular meeting every 4 years, the members of
the Committee shall elect a Chair by majority vote who shall serve
until the next Chair is elected.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
4. The Committee shall convene on or before September 1,
2017, and shall meet at least once every 4 years thereafter. The
Committee may also meet at such further times as deemed necessary
by the Chair.
5. A majority of the members of the Committee constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at any meeting is sufficient for any official action
taken by the Committee.
Sec. 25. Chapter 432B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 26 and 27 of this act.
Sec. 26. “Judicial officer” means a person who is appointed
by a court to act as a judicial officer of the court.
Sec. 27. 1. A court may, upon the motion of a party or its
own motion, consider transferring proceedings under this section
and NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive, to another court in this
State. If the court determines that such a transfer may be in the
best interests of the child who is the subject of the proceedings, the
court shall contact the receiving court to schedule a joint hearing.
The originating court shall notify the following persons and
entities of the hearing:
(a) The agency which provides child welfare services in the
jurisdiction where the originating court is located;
(b) The agency which provides child welfare services that
serves the jurisdiction of the receiving court, if that agency is
different from the agency which currently has custody of the
child; and
(c) All parties to the proceedings.
2. At the joint hearing conducted pursuant to subsection 1,
the originating court shall provide each person or entity notified of
the hearing an opportunity to express an opinion as to the transfer
of the case:
(a) At the hearing; or
(b) By written comment.
3. The originating court and the receiving court may not
communicate about the facts of the proceedings that are the
subject of a joint hearing conducted pursuant to subsection 1
outside of that joint hearing, but may communicate about
scheduling, the transfer of documents and other administrative
matters.
4. An originating court may, after conducting a joint hearing
pursuant to subsection 1, transfer proceedings under this section
and NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive, to a receiving court
and the receiving court may accept the transfer only if each court
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
determines in accordance with subsection 5 that the transfer
would be in the best interests of the child who is the subject of the
proceedings. The proceedings must be transferred if both courts
make such a determination. If both courts make such a
determination, the receiving court shall notify each person or
entity listed in subsection 1 of that decision.
5. When determining if the transfer of proceedings under this
section and NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive, would be in the
best interests of the child who is the subject of the proceedings, a
court shall consider:
(a) Which jurisdiction has the most significant contacts with
the child;
(b) The residence of any parent or guardian who has current
physical custody of the child;
(c) The location of the school the child currently attends;
(d) If the Indian Child Welfare Act applies, the
recommendations of any relevant Indian tribe;
(e) If the child is receiving any services in the jurisdiction
where the originating court is located and the ability of the child to
continue to receive those services in the jurisdiction where the
receiving court is located; and
(f) Any other factor the court deems appropriate.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a motion
is made pursuant to subsection 1 before disposition of the case
pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 432B.530, any transfer of the
proceedings pursuant to this section must occur after an
adjudicatory hearing held pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
432B.530 and before disposition of the case. If all parties agree to
transfer the proceedings before the adjudicatory hearing, the
originating court and the receiving court may elect to hold a joint
hearing pursuant to subsection 1 and, if both courts determine
pursuant to subsection 5 that the transfer would be in the best
interests of the child, transfer the proceedings to the receiving
court before the adjudicatory hearing.
7. If a receiving court accepts the transfer of proceedings
after a joint hearing is conducted pursuant to subsection 1 and the
agency which provides child welfare services in the jurisdiction of
the receiving court is different from the agency which provides
child welfare services in the jurisdiction of the originating court,
the receiving court shall order the transfer of all responsibilities of
the agency which provides child welfare services with regard to the
child who is the subject of the proceedings, including, where
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
applicable, the custody of the child, to the agency which provides
child welfare services in the jurisdiction of the receiving court.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Originating court” means a court that is considering
transferring proceedings under this section and NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive, to a receiving court or has transferred such
proceedings to a receiving court.
(b) “Receiving court” means the court to which an originating
court is considering transferring proceedings under this section
and NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive, or has transferred such
proceedings.
Sec. 28. NRS 432B.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 432B.020 to
432B.110, inclusive, and section 26 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 29. NRS 432B.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.250 Any person who is required to make a report
pursuant to NRS 432B.220 may not invoke any of the privileges set
forth in chapter 49 of NRS:
1. For failure to make a report pursuant to NRS 432B.220;
2. In cooperating with an agency which provides child welfare
services or a guardian ad litem for a child; or
3. In any proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive [.] , and section 27 of this act.
Sec. 30. NRS 432B.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.420 1. A parent or other person responsible for the
welfare of a child [who is alleged to have abused or neglected the
child] may be represented by an attorney at [all stages of any
proceedings under NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive.] a
hearing held pursuant to NRS 432B.470. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3, if the person is indigent, the court may
appoint an attorney to represent the person.
2. A child who is alleged to [have been abused or neglected] be
in need of protection shall be deemed to be a party to any
proceedings under NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive [.] , and
section 27 of this act. The court shall appoint an attorney to
represent the child. The child must be represented by an attorney at
all stages of any proceedings held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive [.] , and section 27 of this act. The attorney
representing the child has the same authority and rights as an
attorney representing any other party to the proceedings.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
3. If the court determines that the parent of an Indian child for
whom protective custody is sought is indigent, the court:
(a) Shall appoint an attorney to represent the parent; and
(b) May apply to the Secretary of the Interior for the payment of
the fees and expenses of such an attorney,
 as provided in the Indian Child Welfare Act.
4. If a petition alleging that a child is in need of protection is
filed pursuant to NRS 432B.490 and the court determines that a
parent or other person responsible for the welfare of the child who
is alleged to have committed an act or omission that resulted in the
child being in need of protection is indigent, the court shall
appoint an attorney to represent the parent or other person at all
stages of any proceedings held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive, and section 27 of this act, unless good cause
is shown for not appointing an attorney to represent the parent or
other person. For the purposes of this subsection, good cause
includes, without limitation:
(a) Failure to communicate with previously appointed counsel;
(b) Harmful or offensive conduct, including, without
limitation, violence or threats of violence, toward previously
appointed counsel;
(c) Requesting new counsel without valid justification; and
(d) A high likelihood that the appointment of counsel will
cause undue delay.
5. If a petition alleging that a child is in need of protection is
filed pursuant to NRS 432B.490, the court may appoint an
attorney to represent a parent or other person responsible for the
welfare of the child who not is alleged to have committed an act or
omission that resulted in the child being in need of protection at
any stage of any proceedings held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive, and section 27 of this act, if the court
determines:
(a) That the parent or other person is indigent; and
(b) Appointment of an attorney is in the best interest of the
child.
6. Each attorney, other than an attorney compensated through a
program for legal aid described in NRS 19.031 and 247.305, if
appointed under the provisions of subsection 1 , [or] 2, 4 or 5, is
entitled to the [same] compensation and payment for expenses [from
the county as provided in NRS 7.125 and 7.135] for all time
reasonably spent on the proceedings and payment for all expenses
reasonably incurred from the proceedings, including, without
limitation, time spent and expenses incurred for preparation,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
hearings and meetings. Such compensation must be paid at a rate
not less than the lowest rate paid to an attorney appointed to
represent a person charged with a [crime.] misdemeanor in the
same jurisdiction.
7. For the purposes of this section, a person is deemed to be
indigent if:
(a) The person has a household income that is less than 200
percent of the federally designated level signifying poverty;
(b) The person is receiving federal assistance through federal
programs, including, without limitation, Medicaid, Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
or disability insurance benefits under the federal Social Security
Act;
(c) The person resides in public housing; or
(d) Hiring counsel would pose a financial hardship to the
person or his or her child or hinder the ability of the person to
obtain services to facilitate reunification with his or her child.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Public housing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 315.021.
(b) “Supplemental Nutrition Assistance” means the program
established to provide persons of low income with an opportunity
to purchase a more nutritious diet pursuant to the Food Stamp Act
of 1977, 7 U.S.C. §§ 2011 et seq., as amended.
(c) “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families” means the
program established to provide temporary assistance for needy
families pursuant to Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
§§ 601 et seq., and other provisions of that act relating to
temporary assistance for needy families.
Sec. 31. NRS 432B.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.430 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3
and 4 and NRS 432B.457, in each judicial district that includes a
county whose population is 700,000 or more:
(a) Any proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive, and section 27 of this act, other than a hearing
held pursuant to subsections 1 to 4, inclusive, of NRS 432B.530 or a
hearing held pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 432B.530 when the
court proceeds immediately, must be open to the general public
unless the judge or [master,] judicial officer, upon his or her own
motion or upon the motion of another person, determines that all or
part of the proceeding must be closed to the general public because
such closure is in the best interests of the child who is the subject of
the proceeding. In determining whether closing all or part of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
proceeding is in the best interests of the child who is the subject of
the proceeding, the judge or [master] judicial officer must consider
and give due weight to the desires of that child.
(b) If the judge or [master] judicial officer determines pursuant
to paragraph (a) that all or part of a proceeding must be closed to the
general public:
(1) The judge or [master] judicial officer must make specific
findings of fact to support such a determination; and
(2) The general public must be excluded and only those
persons having a direct interest in the case, as determined by the
judge or [master,] judicial officer, may be admitted to the
proceeding.
(c) Any proceeding held pursuant to subsections 1 to 4,
inclusive, of NRS 432B.530 and any proceeding held pursuant to
subsection 5 of NRS 432B.530 when the court proceeds
immediately must be closed to the general public unless the judge or
[master,] judicial officer, upon his or her own motion or upon
the motion of another person, determines that all or part of the
proceeding must be open to the general public because opening the
proceeding in such a manner is in the best interests of the child who
is the subject of the proceeding. In determining whether opening all
or part of the proceeding is in the best interests of the child who is
the subject of the proceeding, the judge or [master] judicial officer
must consider and give due weight to the desires of that child. If the
judge or [master] judicial officer determines pursuant to this
paragraph that all or part of a proceeding must be open to the
general public, the judge or [master] judicial officer must make
specific findings of fact to support such a determination. Unless the
judge or [master] judicial officer determines pursuant to this
paragraph that all or part of a proceeding described in this paragraph
must be open to the general public, the general public must be
excluded and only those persons having a direct interest in the case,
as determined by the judge or [master,] judicial officer, may be
admitted to the proceeding.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4 and
NRS 432B.457, in each judicial district that includes a county
whose population is less than 700,000:
(a) Any proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive, and section 27 of this act must be closed to the
general public unless the judge or [master,] judicial officer, upon
his or her own motion or upon the motion of another person,
determines that all or part of the proceeding must be open to the
general public because opening the proceeding in such a manner is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
in the best interests of the child who is the subject of the proceeding.
In determining whether opening all or part of the proceeding is in
the best interests of the child who is the subject of the proceeding,
the judge or [master] judicial officer shall consider and give due
weight to the desires of that child.
(b) If the judge or [master] judicial officer determines pursuant
to paragraph (a) that all or part of a proceeding must be open to the
general public, the judge or [master] judicial officer must make
specific findings of fact to support such a determination.
(c) Unless the judge or [master] judicial officer determines
pursuant to paragraph (a) that all or part of a proceeding must be
open to the general public, the general public must be excluded and
only those persons having a direct interest in the case, as determined
by the judge or [master,] judicial officer, may be admitted to the
proceeding.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 and NRS
432B.457, in a proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.470, the
general public must be excluded and only those persons having a
direct interest in the case, as determined by the judge or [master,]
judicial officer, may be admitted to the proceeding.
4. In conducting a proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.410
to 432B.590, inclusive, and section 27 of this act, a judge or
[master] judicial officer shall keep information confidential to the
extent necessary to obtain federal funds in the maximum amount
available to this state.
Sec. 32. NRS 432B.455 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.455 1. If the court determines that a child must be kept
in protective custody pursuant to NRS 432B.480 or must be placed
in temporary or permanent custody pursuant to NRS 432B.550, the
court may, before placing the child in the temporary or permanent
custody of a person, order the appointment of a special [master]
judicial officer from among the members of the State Bar of Nevada
to conduct a hearing to identify the person most qualified and
suitable to take custody of the child in consideration of the needs of
the child for temporary or permanent placement.
2. Not later than 5 calendar days after the hearing, the special
[master] judicial officer shall prepare and submit to the court a
recommendation regarding which person is most qualified and
suitable to take custody of the child.
3. A court may designate a different title to a person
appointed as a special judicial officer so long as the title does not
include the term “master.”
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
Sec. 33. NRS 432B.457 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.457 1. If, upon the initiative of the court or a special
[master] judicial officer appointed pursuant to NRS 432B.455 or the
motion of a party, the court or special [master] judicial officer finds
that a person has a special interest in a child, the court or special
[master] judicial officer shall:
(a) Except for good cause, ensure that the person is involved in
and notified of any plan for the temporary or permanent placement
of the child and is allowed to offer recommendations regarding the
plan; and
(b) Allow the person to testify at any hearing held pursuant to
this chapter to determine any temporary or permanent placement of
the child.
2. A finding that a person has a special interest in a child
pursuant to subsection 1 may be reviewed or modified at any time
by the court or special [master.] judicial officer.
3. For the purposes of this section, a person “has a special
interest in a child” if:
(a) The person is:
(1) A parent or other relative of the child;
(2) A foster parent or other provider of substitute care for the
child;
(3) A provider of care for the medical or mental health of the
child;
(4) An educational decision maker appointed for the child
pursuant to NRS 432B.462; or
(5) A teacher or other school official who works directly
with the child; and
(b) The person:
(1) Has a personal interest in the well-being of the child; or
(2) Possesses information that is relevant to the
determination of the placement of the child.
Sec. 34. NRS 432B.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.470 1. A child placed in protective custody pursuant to
NRS 432B.390 must be given a hearing, conducted by a judge,
[master] judicial officer or special [master] judicial officer
appointed by the judge for that particular hearing, within 72 hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after being placed in
protective custody, to determine whether the child should remain in
protective custody pending further action by the court.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, notice of
the time and place of the hearing must be given to a parent or other
person responsible for the child’s welfare:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
(a) By personal service of a written notice;
(b) Orally, with a written notice mailed to the last known
address of the parent or other person responsible for the child’s
welfare within 24 hours after the child is placed in protective
custody; or
(c) If the parent or other person responsible for the child’s
welfare cannot be located for personal or oral service, by mailing a
written notice to the last known address of the parent or other person
responsible for the child’s welfare within 24 hours after the child is
placed in protective custody.
 If the child was delivered to a provider of emergency services
pursuant to NRS 432B.630, the parent who delivered the child to the
provider shall be deemed to have waived any right to notice of the
hearing conducted pursuant to this section.
3. If the parent or other person responsible for the child’s
welfare cannot be located for personal or oral notice and the last
known address of the parent or other person responsible for the
child’s welfare cannot be ascertained, reasonable efforts must be
made to locate and notify the parent or other person responsible for
the child’s welfare as soon as possible.
4. Actual notice of the hearing or appearance at the hearing
shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements relating to notice set
forth in this section.
Sec. 35. NRS 432B.513 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.513 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
person who submits a report or information to the court for
consideration in a proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.466 to
432B.468, inclusive, or 432B.500 to 432B.590, inclusive, and
section 27 of this act, shall provide a copy of the report or
information, to the extent that the data or information in the report
or information is available pursuant to NRS 432B.290, to each
parent or guardian of the child who is the subject of the proceeding
and to the attorney of each parent or guardian not later than 72 hours
before the proceeding.
2. If a person does not provide a copy of a report or
information to a parent or guardian of a child and an attorney of the
parent or guardian before a proceeding if required by subsection 1,
the court or [master:] judicial officer:
(a) Shall provide the parent or guardian and the attorney of the
parent or guardian an opportunity to review the report or
information; and
(b) May grant a continuance of the proceeding until a later date
that is agreed upon by all the parties to the proceeding if the parent
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
or guardian or the attorney of the parent or guardian requests that
the court grant the continuance so that the parent or guardian and the
attorney of the parent or guardian may properly respond to the
report or information.
3. If a child was delivered to a provider of emergency services
pursuant to NRS 432B.630, a copy of a report or information
described in subsection 1 need not be sent to the parent who
delivered the child to the provider or the attorney of that parent
pursuant to subsection 1.
4. As used in this section, “person” includes, without
limitation, a government, governmental agency or political
subdivision of a government.
Sec. 36. NRS 432B.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.550 1. If the court finds that a child is in need of
protection, it may, by its order, after receipt and review of the report
from the agency which provides child welfare services:
(a) Permit the child to remain in the temporary or permanent
custody of the parents of the child or a guardian with or without
supervision by the court or a person or agency designated by the
court, and with or without retaining jurisdiction of the case, upon
such conditions as the court may prescribe;
(b) Place the child in the temporary or permanent custody of a
relative, a fictive kin or other person the court finds suitable to
receive and care for the child with or without supervision, and with
or without retaining jurisdiction of the case, upon such conditions as
the court may prescribe; or
(c) Place the child in the temporary custody of a public agency
or institution authorized to care for children, the local juvenile
probation department, the local department of juvenile services or a
private agency or institution licensed by the Department of Health
and Human Services or a county whose population is 100,000 or
more to care for such a child.
 In carrying out this subsection, the court may, in its sole
discretion and in compliance with the requirements of chapter 159A
of NRS, consider an application for the guardianship of the child. If
the court grants such an application, it may retain jurisdiction of the
case or transfer the case to another court of competent jurisdiction
[.] in accordance with section 27 of this act.
2. The court shall not deny placement of a child in the
temporary or permanent custody of a person pursuant to subsection
1 solely because the person:
(a) Is deaf, is blind or has another physical disability; or
(b) Is the holder of a valid registry identification card.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
3. If, pursuant to subsection 1, a child is placed other than with
a parent:
(a) The parent retains the right to consent to adoption, to
determine the child’s religious affiliation and to reasonable
visitation, unless restricted by the court. If the custodian of the child
interferes with these rights, the parent may petition the court for
enforcement of the rights of the parent.
(b) The court shall set forth good cause why the child was
placed other than with a parent.
4. If, pursuant to subsection 1, the child is to be placed with a
relative or fictive kin, the court may consider, among other factors,
whether the child has resided with a particular relative or fictive kin
for 3 years or more before the incident which brought the child to
the court’s attention.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a copy of
the report prepared for the court by the agency which provides child
welfare services must be sent to the custodian and the parent or legal
guardian. If the child was delivered to a provider of emergency
services pursuant to NRS 432B.630:
(a) The parent who delivered the child to the provider shall be
deemed to have waived his or her right to a copy of the report; and
(b) A copy of the report must be sent to the parent who did not
deliver the child to the provider, if the location of such parent is
known.
6. In determining the placement of a child pursuant to this
section, if the child is not permitted to remain in the custody of the
parents of the child or guardian:
(a) It must be presumed to be in the best interests of the child to
be placed together with the siblings of the child.
(b) Preference must be given to placing the child in the
following order:
(1) With any person related within the fifth degree of
consanguinity to the child or a fictive kin, and who is suitable and
able to provide proper care and guidance for the child, regardless of
whether the relative or fictive kin resides within this State.
(2) In a foster home that is licensed pursuant to chapter 424
of NRS.
7. Any search for a relative with whom to place a child
pursuant to this section must be completed within 1 year after the
initial placement of the child outside of the home of the child. If a
child is placed with any person who resides outside of this State, the
placement must be in accordance with NRS 127.330.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
8. Within 60 days after the removal of a child from the home of
the child, the court shall:
(a) Determine whether:
(1) The agency which provides child welfare services has
made the reasonable efforts required by paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of NRS 432B.393; or
(2) No such efforts are required in the particular case; and
(b) Prepare an explicit statement of the facts upon which its
determination is based.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Blind” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 426.082.
(b) “Holder of a valid registry identification card” means a
person who holds a valid registry identification card as defined in
NRS 678C.080 that identifies the person as:
(1) Exempt from state prosecution for engaging in the
medical use of cannabis; or
(2) A designated primary caregiver as defined in
NRS 678C.040.
Sec. 37. NRS 1.428 is hereby amended to read as follows:
1.428 “Judge” means:
1. A justice of the Supreme Court;
2. A judge of the Court of Appeals;
3. A judge of the district court;
4. A judge of the municipal court;
5. A justice of the peace;
6. Any other officer of the Judicial Branch of this State,
whether or not the officer is an attorney, who presides over judicial
proceedings, including, but not limited to, a magistrate, court
commissioner, special master , judicial officer appointed by a court
or referee; and
7. Any person who formerly served in any of the positions
described in subsections 1 to 6, inclusive, if the conduct at issue for
purposes of NRS 1.425 to 1.4695, inclusive, occurred while the
person was serving in such a position.
Sec. 38. Chapter 3 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Judicial officer” means a person who is appointed by a court
to act as a judicial officer of the court.
Sec. 39. NRS 3.001 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.001 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 3.002 to 3.008,
inclusive, and section 38 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
Sec. 40. NRS 3.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.025 1. In each judicial district that includes a county whose
population is 100,000 or more, the district judges of that judicial
district shall choose from among those district judges a Chief Judge
who is to be the presiding judge of the judicial district.
2. The Chief Judge shall:
(a) Assign cases to each judge in the judicial district;
(b) Prescribe the hours of court;
(c) Adopt such other rules as are necessary for the orderly
conduct of court business; and
(d) Perform all other duties of the Chief Judge or of a presiding
judge that are set forth in this chapter and any other provision of
NRS.
3. If a case involves a matter within the jurisdiction of the
family court and:
(a) The parties to the case are also the parties in any other
pending case or were the parties in any other previously decided
case assigned to a department of the family court in the judicial
district; or
(b) A child involved in the case is also involved in any other
pending case or was involved in any other previously decided case
assigned to a department of the family court in the judicial district,
other than a case within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court
pursuant to title 5 of NRS,
 the Chief Judge shall assign the case to the department of the
family court to which the other case is presently assigned or, if the
other case has been decided, to the department of the family court
that decided the other case, unless a different assignment is required
by another provision of NRS, a court rule or the Revised Nevada
Code of Judicial Conduct or the Chief Judge determines that a
different assignment is necessary because of considerations related
to the management of the caseload of the district judges within the
judicial district. If a case described in this subsection is heard
initially by a [master,] judicial officer, the recommendation, report
or order of the [master] judicial officer must be submitted to the
district judge of the department of the family court to which the case
has been assigned pursuant to this subsection for consideration and
decision by that district judge.
Sec. 41. NRS 3.026 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.026 1. In each judicial district that includes a county whose
population is 100,000 or more, in addition to the other duties set
forth in NRS 3.025:
(a) The Chief Judge shall ensure that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
(1) The procedures which govern the consideration and
disposition of cases and other proceedings within the jurisdiction of
the district court are applied as uniformly as practicable; and
(2) Cases and other proceedings within the jurisdiction of the
district court are considered and decided in a timely manner.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the Chief
Judge shall establish procedures for addressing grievances that are:
(1) Submitted to the Chief Judge by a party in a case or other
proceeding within the jurisdiction of the district court; and
(2) Directly related to the administration of the case or other
proceeding.
2. For the purposes of paragraph (b) of subsection 1, a party in
a case or other proceeding within the jurisdiction of the district court
may not submit to the Chief Judge a grievance that:
(a) Addresses, in whole or in part, the merits of the case or other
proceeding; or
(b) Challenges, in whole or in part, the merits of any decision or
ruling in the case or other proceeding that is made by:
(1) The district court; or
(2) A master , judicial officer or other person who is acting
pursuant to an order of the district court or pursuant to any authority
that is granted to the master , judicial officer or other person by a
specific statute, including, without limitation, NRS 3.405, 3.475 and
3.500.
Sec. 42. NRS 3.2201 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.2201 1. The district court has exclusive jurisdiction to
accept an application for, to consider an application for, and to issue
or deny the issuance of any of the following orders when the
adverse party against whom the order is sought is a child who is
under 18 years of age:
(a) A temporary or extended order for protection against
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.017 to 33.100, inclusive.
(b) A temporary or extended order for protection against
harassment in the workplace pursuant to NRS 33.200 to 33.360,
inclusive.
(c) An emergency or extended order for protection against high-
risk behavior pursuant to NRS 33.500 to 33.670, inclusive.
(d) A temporary or extended order for protection against sexual
assault pursuant to NRS 200.378.
(e) A temporary or extended order for protection against
stalking, aggravated stalking or harassment pursuant to
NRS 200.591.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
2. If the district court issues an order listed in subsection 1, the
order must be served upon:
(a) The child who is the adverse party; and
(b) The parent or guardian of the child.
3. The juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction over any action
in which it is alleged that a child who is the adverse party in an
order listed in subsection 1 has committed a delinquent act by
violating a condition set forth in the order.
4. If the district court issues an order listed in subsection 1 and
the adverse party reaches the age of 18 years while the order is still
in effect, the order remains effective against the adverse party until
the order expires or is dissolved by the district court.
5. The district court shall automatically seal all records related
to the application for, consideration of and issuance of an order
listed in subsection 1 as provided in NRS 62H.140 upon the
dissolution or expiration of the order or when the adverse party
reaches the age of 18 years, whichever is earlier, unless, at such a
time, the order is still in effect, in which case the records must be
automatically sealed by the district court upon the expiration or
dissolution of the order.
6. A district court may appoint a [master] judicial officer to
conduct the proceedings described in this section.
7. An admission, representation or statement made during a
proceeding described in this section is not admissible in any
criminal proceeding.
8. A court may designate, by rule or order, a different title for
a judicial officer so long as the title does not include the term
“master.”
9. As used in this section, “criminal proceeding” means:
(a) A trial or hearing before a court in a prosecution of a person
charged with violating a criminal law of this State; or
(b) A delinquency proceeding which is conducted pursuant to
title 5 of NRS.
Sec. 43. NRS 3.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.405 1. In an action to establish paternity, the court may
appoint a [master] judicial officer to take testimony and recommend
orders.
2. The court may appoint a [master] judicial officer to hear all
cases in a county to establish or enforce an obligation for the
support of a child, or to modify or adjust an order for the support of
a child pursuant to NRS 125B.145.
3. The [master] judicial officer must be an attorney licensed to
practice in this State. The [master:] judicial officer:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
(a) Shall take testimony and establish a record;
(b) In complex cases shall issue temporary orders for support
pending resolution of the case;
(c) Shall make findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations for the establishment and enforcement of an
order;
(d) May accept voluntary acknowledgments of paternity or
liability for support and stipulated agreements setting the amount of
support;
(e) May, subject to confirmation by the district court, enter
default orders against a responsible parent who does not respond to
a notice or service within the required time; and
(f) Has any other power or duty contained in the order of
reference issued by the court.
 If a temporary order for support is issued pursuant to paragraph
(b), the [master] judicial officer shall order that the support be paid
to the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services, its designated
representative or the district attorney, if the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services or district attorney is involved in the case, or
otherwise to an appropriate party to the action, pending resolution of
the case.
4. The findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations of the [master] judicial officer must be furnished
to each party or the party’s attorney at the conclusion of the
proceeding or as soon thereafter as possible. Within 10 days after
receipt of the findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations, either party may file with the court and serve
upon the other party written objections to the report. If no objection
is filed, the court shall accept the findings of fact, unless clearly
erroneous, and the judgment may be entered thereon. If an objection
is filed within the 10-day period, the court shall review the matter
upon notice and motion.
5. A court may designate, by rule or order, a different title for
a judicial officer so long as the title does not include the term
“master.”
Sec. 44. NRS 3.475 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.475 1. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more,
the district court shall establish by rule approved by the Supreme
Court a program of mandatory mediation in cases that involve the
custody or visitation of a child.
2. The program must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
(a) Require the impartial mediation of the issues of custody and
visitation and authorize the impartial mediation of any other
nonfinancial issue deemed appropriate by the court.
(b) Authorize the court to exclude a case from the program for
good cause shown, including, but not limited to, a showing that:
(1) There is a history of child abuse or domestic violence by
one of the parties;
(2) The parties are currently participating in private
mediation; or
(3) One of the parties resides outside of the jurisdiction of the
court.
(c) Provide standards for the training of the mediators assigned
to cases, including, but not limited to:
(1) Minimum educational requirements, which must not be
restricted to any particular professional or educational training;
(2) Minimum requirements for training in the procedural
aspects of mediation and the interpersonal skills necessary to act as
a mediator;
(3) A minimum period of apprenticeship for persons who
have not previously acted as domestic mediators;
(4) Minimum requirements for continuing education; and
(5) Procedures to ensure that potential mediators understand
the high standard of ethics and confidentiality related to their
participation in the program.
(d) Prohibit the mediator from reporting to the court any
information about the mediation other than whether the dispute was
resolved.
(e) Establish a sliding schedule of fees for participation in the
program based on the ability of a party to pay.
(f) Provide for the acceptance of gifts and grants offered in
support of the program.
(g) Allow the court to refer the parties to a private mediator.
3. The costs of the program must be paid from the county
general fund. All fees, gifts and grants collected pursuant to this
section must be deposited in the county general fund.
4. This section does not prohibit a court from referring a
financial or other issue to a special [master] judicial officer or other
person for assistance in resolving the dispute.
Sec. 45. NRS 3.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.500 1. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more
and less than 700,000, the district court shall establish by rule
approved by the Supreme Court a program of mandatory mediation
in cases which involve the custody or visitation of a child. A district
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
court in a county whose population is less than 100,000 may
establish such a program in the same manner for use in that county.
The district courts in two or more counties whose populations are
less than 100,000 may establish such a program in the same manner
for use in the counties in which the courts are located.
2. The program must:
(a) Require the impartial mediation of the issues of custody and
visitation and any other nonfinancial issue deemed appropriate by
the court.
(b) Allow the court to exclude a case from the program for good
cause shown, including a showing of a history of child abuse or
domestic violence by one of the parties, ongoing private mediation
or residency of one of the parties out of the jurisdiction of the court.
(c) Provide standards for the training of the mediators assigned
to cases pursuant to the rule, including but not limited to:
(1) Minimum educational requirements, which may not be
restricted to any particular professional or educational training;
(2) Minimum requirements for training in the procedural
aspects of mediation and the interpersonal skills necessary to act as
a mediator;
(3) A minimum period of apprenticeship for persons who
have not previously acted as domestic mediators;
(4) Minimum requirements for continuing education; and
(5) Procedures to ensure that potential mediators understand
the high standard of ethics and confidentiality related to their
participation in the program.
(d) Prohibit the mediator from reporting to the court any
information about the mediation other than whether the mediation
was successful or not.
(e) Establish a sliding schedule of fees for participation in the
program based on the client’s ability to pay.
(f) Provide for the acceptance of gifts and grants offered in
support of the program.
(g) Allow the court to refer the parties to a private mediator for
assistance in resolving the issues.
3. The costs of the program must be paid from the account for
dispute resolution in the county general fund. All fees, gifts and
grants collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the
account.
4. This section does not prohibit a court from referring a
financial or other issue to a special [master] judicial officer or other
person for assistance in resolving the dispute.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
Sec. 46. NRS 4.357 is hereby amended to read as follows:
4.357 1. In any county in which the appointment of [masters]
judicial officers by a justice court is authorized by the board of
county commissioners, the local rules of practice adopted in a
justice court within the county may authorize the appointment of
one or more [masters] judicial officers to perform certain duties that
the Supreme Court has approved. If the justice court elects to
appoint a [master or masters,] judicial officer, the local rules of
practice adopted in that court must set forth the selection process for
choosing a [master.] judicial officer.
2. A [master] judicial officer appointed pursuant to subsection
1 must possess qualifications that are equal to or greater than the
qualifications required of the justice of the peace for the township in
which the [master] judicial officer is appointed as set forth in
NRS 4.010.
3. The Supreme Court shall provide by rule for a course of
instruction in the elements of substantive law relating to the duties
of any [master] judicial officer appointed pursuant to subsection 1.
A [master] judicial officer appointed pursuant to subsection 1 may
not perform any duties of a [master] judicial officer appointed by
the court until he or she has completed the course of instruction
described in this subsection.
4. A [master] judicial officer appointed pursuant to subsection
1 may not preside over:
(a) Any trial for a misdemeanor constituting:
(1) An act of domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018; or
(2) A violation of NRS 484B.657, 484C.110 or 484C.120; or
(b) Any preliminary hearing for a gross misdemeanor or felony.
5. A person appointed as a [master] judicial officer must take
and subscribe to the official oath before acting as a [master.]
judicial officer.
6. A [master] judicial officer appointed by the court is entitled
to receive a salary or a per diem salary set by the board of county
commissioners. The annual sum expended for salaries of [masters]
such judicial officers must not exceed the amount budgeted for
those expenses by the board of county commissioners.
7. A justice court may, by local rule or order, designate
another title for a judicial officer appointed pursuant to this
section so long as the title does not include the term “master.”
Sec. 47. NRS 5.0245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
5.0245 1. A municipal court may appoint a referee or
[hearing master] judicial officer to take testimony and recommend
orders and a judgment in any action to determine whether a person
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
has committed a civil infraction punishable pursuant to NRS
484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive.
2. The referee or [hearing master:] judicial officer:
(a) Shall take testimony;
(b) Shall make findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations for an order or judgment;
(c) May, subject to confirmation by the court, enter an order or
judgment; and
(d) Has any other power or duty contained in the order of
reference issued by the court.
3. The findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations of the referee or [hearing master] judicial officer
must be furnished to each party or his or her attorney at the
conclusion of the proceeding or as soon thereafter as possible.
Within 5 days after receipt of the findings of fact, conclusions of
law and recommendations, a party may file a written objection. If no
objection is filed, the court shall accept the findings, unless clearly
erroneous, and the judgment may be entered thereon. If an objection
is filed within the 5-day period, the court shall review the matter by
trial de novo, except that if all of the parties so stipulate, the review
must be confined to the record.
4. A municipal court may, by local rule or order, designate a
different title for a judicial officer appointed pursuant to this
section so long as the title does not include the term “master.”
Sec. 48. NRS 33.019 is hereby amended to read as follows:
33.019 1. [In] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
in an action to issue, dissolve, convert, modify, register or enforce a
temporary or extended order pursuant to NRS 33.017 to 33.100,
inclusive, the court may appoint [a] :
(a) A master to take testimony and recommend orders [.] if the
temporary or extended order was sought by a person who is at
least 18 years of age; or
(b) A judicial officer to take testimony and recommend orders,
if the temporary or extended order was sought by a person who is
less than 18 years of age.
2. The master or judicial officer must be an attorney licensed
to practice in this State.
3. The master or judicial officer shall:
(a) Take testimony and establish a record; and
(b) Make findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations concerning a temporary or extended order.
4. A court may, by local rule or order, designate a different
title for a judicial officer appointed pursuant to paragraph (b) of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
subsection 1 so long as the title does not include the term
“master.”
Sec. 49. NRS 49.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
49.295 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3 and NRS 49.305:
(a) A married person cannot be examined as a witness for or
against his or her spouse without his or her consent.
(b) No spouse can be examined, during the marriage or
afterwards, without the consent of the other spouse, as to any
communication made by one to the other during marriage.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a:
(a) Civil proceeding brought by or on behalf of one spouse
against the other spouse;
(b) Proceeding to commit or otherwise place a spouse, the
property of the spouse or both the spouse and the property of the
spouse under the control of another because of the alleged mental or
physical condition of the spouse;
(c) Proceeding brought by or on behalf of a spouse to establish
his or her competence;
(d) Proceeding in the juvenile court or family court pursuant to
title 5 of NRS or NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive [;] , and
section 27 of this act; or
(e) Criminal proceeding in which one spouse is charged with:
(1) A crime against the person or the property of the other
spouse or of a child of either, or of a child in the custody or control
of either, whether the crime was committed before or during
marriage.
(2) Bigamy or incest.
(3) A crime related to abandonment of a child or nonsupport
of the other spouse or child.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply in any criminal
proceeding to events which took place before the spouses were
married.
Sec. 50. NRS 50.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
50.175 Every person who has been, in good faith, served with a
subpoena to attend as a witness before a court, judge, commissioner,
master [.] , judicial officer appointed by a court or other person, in
a case where the disobedience of the witness may be punished as a
contempt, is exonerated from arrest in a civil action while going to
the place of attendance, necessarily remaining there, and returning
therefrom.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
Sec. 51. NRS 50.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
50.225 1. For attending the courts of this State in any
criminal case, civil suit, hearing to contest the determination that a
person has committed a civil infraction or proceeding before a court
of record, master, judicial officer appointed by a court,
commissioner, justice of the peace, or before the grand jury, in
obedience to a subpoena, each witness is entitled:
(a) To be paid a fee of $25 for each day’s attendance, including
Sundays and holidays.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, to be paid
for attending a court of the county in which the witness resides at
the standard mileage reimbursement rate for which a deduction is
allowed for the purposes of federal income tax for each mile
necessarily and actually traveled from and returning to the place of
residence by the shortest and most practical route. A board of
county commissioners may provide that, for each mile so traveled to
attend a court of the county in which the witness resides, each
witness is entitled to be paid an amount equal to the allowance for
travel by private conveyance established by the State Board of
Examiners for state officers and employees generally. If the board of
county commissioners so provides, each witness at any other
hearing or proceeding held in that county who is entitled to receive
the payment for mileage specified in this paragraph must be paid
mileage in an amount equal to the allowance for travel by private
conveyance established by the State Board of Examiners for state
officers and employees generally.
2. In addition to the fee and payment for mileage specified in
subsection 1, a board of county commissioners may provide that, for
each day of attendance in a court of the county in which the witness
resides, each witness is entitled to be paid the per diem allowance
provided for state officers and employees generally. If the board of
county commissioners so provides, each witness at any other
hearing or proceeding held in that county who is a resident of that
county and who is entitled to receive the fee specified in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 must be paid, in addition to that fee, the per diem
allowance provided for state officers and employees generally.
3. If a witness is from without the county or, being a resident
of another state, voluntarily appears as a witness at the request of the
Attorney General or the district attorney and the board of county
commissioners of the county in which the court is held, the witness
is entitled to reimbursement for the actual and necessary expenses
for going to and returning from the place where the court is held.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
The witness is also entitled to receive the same per diem allowance
provided for state officers and employees generally.
4. Any person in attendance at a trial or hearing to contest the
determination that a person has committed a civil infraction who is
sworn as a witness is entitled to the fees, the per diem allowance, if
any, travel expenses and any other reimbursement set forth in this
section, irrespective of the service of a subpoena.
5. Witness fees, per diem allowances, travel expenses and other
reimbursement in civil cases, including, without limitation, a
hearing to contest the determination that a person has committed a
civil infraction, must be taxed as disbursement costs against the
defeated party upon proof by affidavit that they have been actually
incurred. Costs must not be allowed for more than two witnesses to
the same fact or series of facts, and a party plaintiff or defendant
must not be allowed any fees, per diem allowance, travel expenses
or other reimbursement for attendance as a witness in his or her own
behalf. Witness fees, per diem allowances, travel expenses and other
reimbursement must not be taxed against a county or incorporated
city after a hearing to contest the determination that a person has
committed a civil infraction unless the court determines, after a
hearing, that the civil infraction citation was issued maliciously and
without probable cause.
6. A person is not obligated to appear in a civil action, hearing
to contest the determination that a person has committed a civil
infraction or other proceeding unless the person has been paid an
amount equal to 1 day’s fees, the per diem allowance provided by
the board of county commissioners pursuant to subsection 2, if any,
and the travel expenses reimbursable pursuant to this section.
Sec. 52. NRS 62A.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62A.180 1. “Juvenile court” means each district judge who is
assigned to serve as a judge of the juvenile court pursuant to NRS
62B.010 or court rule.
2. The term includes a [master] juvenile judicial officer who is
performing an act on behalf of the juvenile court if:
(a) The juvenile court delegates authority to the [master]
juvenile judicial officer to perform the act in accordance with the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; and
(b) The [master] juvenile judicial officer performs the act
within the limits of the authority delegated to the [master.] juvenile
judicial officer.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
Sec. 53. NRS 62A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62A.210 [“Master of the juvenile court”] “Juvenile judicial
officer” means a person who is appointed to act as a [master]
judicial officer of the juvenile court pursuant to NRS 62B.020.
Sec. 54. NRS 62B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62B.020 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
juvenile court or the chief judge of the judicial district may appoint
any person to act as a [master of the] juvenile [court] judicial officer
if the person is qualified by previous experience, training and
demonstrated interest in the welfare of children to act as a [master of
the] juvenile [court.] judicial officer.
2. A probation officer shall not act as a [master of the] juvenile
[court] judicial officer unless the proceeding concerns:
(a) A minor traffic offense;
(b) An offense related to tobacco; or
(c) A child who is alleged to be a habitual truant.
3. If a person is appointed to act as a [master of the] juvenile
[court,] judicial officer, the person shall attend instruction at the
National Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges in Reno,
Nevada, in a course designed for the training of new judges of the
juvenile court on the first occasion when such instruction is offered
after the person is appointed.
4. If, for any reason, a [master of the] juvenile [court] judicial
officer is unable to act, the juvenile court or the chief judge of the
judicial district may appoint another qualified person to act
temporarily as a [master of the] juvenile [court] judicial officer
during the period that the [master] juvenile judicial officer who is
regularly appointed is unable to act.
5. The compensation of a [master of the] juvenile [court:]
judicial officer:
(a) May not be taxed against the parties.
(b) Must be paid out of appropriations made for the expenses of
the district court, if the compensation is fixed by the juvenile court.
6. A juvenile court or the chief judge of a judicial district may
designate, by rule or order, a different title for a juvenile judicial
officer appointed by the juvenile court or chief judge so long as
the title does not include the term “master.”
Sec. 55. NRS 62B.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62B.030 1. The juvenile court may order a [master of the]
juvenile [court] judicial officer to:
(a) Swear witnesses.
(b) Take evidence.
(c) Make findings of fact and recommendations.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
(d) Conduct all proceedings before the [master of the] juvenile
[court] judicial officer in the same manner as a district judge
conducts proceedings in a district court.
2. Not later than 10 days after the evidence before a [master of
the] juvenile [court] judicial officer is closed, the [master] juvenile
judicial officer shall file with the juvenile court:
(a) All papers relating to the case;
(b) Written findings of fact; and
(c) Written recommendations.
3. A [master of the] juvenile [court] judicial officer shall
provide to the parent or guardian of the child, the attorney for the
child, the district attorney, and any other person concerned, written
notice of:
(a) The [master’s] findings of fact [;] of the juvenile judicial
officer;
(b) The [master’s] recommendations [;] of the juvenile judicial
officer;
(c) The right to object to the [master’s] recommendations [;] of
the juvenile judicial officer; and
(d) The right to request a hearing de novo before the juvenile
court as provided in subsection 4.
4. After reviewing the recommendations of a [master of the]
juvenile [court] judicial officer and any objection to the [master’s]
recommendations [,] of the juvenile judicial officer, the juvenile
court shall:
(a) Approve the [master’s] recommendations [,] of the juvenile
judicial officer, in whole or in part, and order the recommended
disposition;
(b) Reject the [master’s] recommendations [,] of the juvenile
judicial officer, in whole or in part, and order such relief as may be
appropriate; or
(c) Direct a hearing de novo before the juvenile court if, not later
than 5 days after the [master] juvenile judicial officer provides
notice of the [master’s] recommendations [,] of the juvenile judicial
officer, a person who is entitled to such notice files with the juvenile
court a request for a hearing de novo before the juvenile court.
5. A recommendation of a [master of the] juvenile [court]
judicial officer is not effective until expressly approved by the
juvenile court as evidenced by the signature of a judge of the
juvenile court.
Sec. 56. NRS 62B.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62B.100 1. All expenses incurred in complying with the
provisions of this title are a charge against the county, except for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
expenses that must be paid by the State of Nevada pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 63 of NRS or a specific statute.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, within the
limits provided by the board of county commissioners, the juvenile
court shall fix the salaries, expenses and other compensation of
[masters of the] juvenile [court,] judicial officers, probation officers
and all employees of the juvenile court.
3. If the board of county commissioners has established a
department of juvenile justice services by ordinance pursuant to
NRS 62G.200 to 62G.240, inclusive, the board of county
commissioners shall fix the salaries, expenses and other
compensation of probation officers, assistant probation officers and
all employees of the department of juvenile justice services.
Sec. 57. NRS 62B.607 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62B.607 1. Any person who, during the scope of his or her
employment, has regular and routine contact with juveniles who are
involved in the juvenile justice system in this State, including,
without limitation, any prosecuting attorney, public defender, peace
officer, probation officer, juvenile correctional officer, employee of
a state or local facility for the detention of children, employee of a
regional facility for the treatment and rehabilitation of children or
employee of a prosecuting attorney’s office or public defender’s
office, shall complete, in addition to any other required training,
training relating to implicit bias and cultural competency provided
by his or her employer pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant
to subsection 3. Unless the regulations adopted by the Division of
Child and Family Services pursuant to subsection 3 provide
otherwise, such training relating to implicit bias and cultural
competency must be completed at least once every 2 years.
2. The training required by subsection 1 must include, without
limitation, instruction that:
(a) Explains what implicit bias is, where implicit bias comes
from, the importance of understanding implicit bias and the negative
impacts of implicit bias, and offers examples of actions that can be
taken to reduce implicit bias;
(b) Provides information regarding cultural competency,
including, without limitation, sensitivity to the needs of children,
lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender persons, racial and ethnic
minorities, religious minorities and women; and
(c) Provides information regarding:
(1) Socioeconomic conditions in various areas in this State;
(2) Historical inequities in the juvenile justice and criminal
justice systems; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
(3) The impact of trauma and adverse child experiences on
the decision making and behaviors of children.
3. The Division of Child and Family Services shall adopt
regulations to carry out the provisions of this section. When
adopting such regulations, the Division of Child and Family
Services may consult with any person whose assistance the Division
of Child and Family Services determines will be helpful.
4. The Nevada Supreme Court may provide by court rule for
continuing appropriate training concerning implicit bias and cultural
competency, incorporating the elements identified in subsection 2,
for any magistrate, judge, [master] judicial officer appointed by the
court or employee in the juvenile court system who regularly and
routinely comes into contact with juveniles who are involved in the
juvenile justice system.
5. As used in this section, “cultural competency” means an
understanding of how people and institutions can respond
respectfully and effectively to people of all cultures, economic
statuses, language backgrounds, races, ethnic backgrounds,
disabilities, religions, genders, gender identities or expressions,
sexual orientations, veteran statuses and other characteristics in a
manner that recognizes, affirms and values the worth and preserves
the dignity of people, families and communities.
Sec. 58. NRS 62F.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62F.350 1. The juvenile court may not refer to a [master]
juvenile judicial officer any finding, determination or other act
required to be made or performed by the juvenile court pursuant to
NRS 62F.320 and 62F.340.
2. As used in this section, [“master”] “juvenile judicial
officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in [Rule 53 of the Nevada
Rules of Civil Procedure.] NRS 62A.210.
Sec. 59. NRS 125B.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
125B.200 As used in NRS 125B.200 to 125B.300, inclusive,
unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Court” includes a referee or [master] judicial officer
appointed by the court.
2. “Minor child” means a person who is:
(a) Under the age of 18 years;
(b) Under the age of 19 years, if the person is enrolled in high
school;
(c) Under a legal disability; or
(d) Not declared emancipated pursuant to NRS 129.080 to
129.140, inclusive.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
3. “Obligor-parent” means a parent who has been ordered by a
court to pay for the support of a minor child.
Sec. 60. NRS 126.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.111 1. The court shall endeavor to resolve the issues
raised in an action pursuant to this chapter by an informal hearing.
2. As soon as practicable after an action to declare the
existence or nonexistence of the father and child relationship has
been brought, an informal hearing must be held. The court may
order that the hearing be held before a [master] judicial officer
appointed by the court or referee. The public shall be barred from
the hearing. A record of the proceeding or any portion thereof must
be kept if any party requests or the court orders. Strict rules of
evidence need not be observed, but those prescribed in NRS
233B.123 apply.
3. Upon refusal of any witness, including a party, to testify
under oath or produce evidence, the court may order the witness to
testify under oath and produce evidence concerning all relevant
facts. If the refusal is upon the ground that the witness’s testimony
or evidence might tend to incriminate the witness, the court may
grant the witness immunity from prosecution for all criminal
offenses shown in whole or in part by testimony or evidence the
witness is required to produce, except for perjury committed in his
or her testimony. The refusal of a witness who has been granted
immunity to obey an order to testify or produce evidence is a civil
contempt of the court.
4. Testimony of a physician concerning the medical
circumstances of the pregnancy and the condition and characteristics
of the child upon birth is not privileged.
Sec. 61. NRS 126.121 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.121 1. The court may, and shall upon the motion of a
party, order the mother, child, alleged father or any other person so
involved to submit to one or more tests for the typing of blood or
taking of specimens for genetic identification to be made by a
designated person, by qualified physicians or by other qualified
persons, under such restrictions and directions as the court or judge
deems proper. Whenever such a test is ordered and made, the results
of the test must be received in evidence and must be made available
to a judge, [master] judicial officer appointed by the court or
referee conducting a hearing pursuant to NRS 126.111. The results
of the test and any sample or specimen taken may be used only for
the purposes specified in this chapter. Unless a party files a written
objection to the result of a test at least 30 days before the hearing at
which the result is to be received in evidence, the result is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
admissible as evidence of paternity without foundational testimony
or other proof of authenticity or accuracy. The order for such a test
also may direct that the testimony of the experts and of the persons
so examined may be taken by deposition or written interrogatories.
2. If any party refuses to submit to or fails to appear for a test
ordered pursuant to subsection 1, the court may presume that the
result of the test would be adverse to the interests of that party or
may enforce its order if the rights of others and the interests of
justice so require.
3. The court, upon reasonable request by a party, shall order
that independent tests for determining paternity be performed by
other experts or qualified laboratories.
4. In all cases, the court shall determine the number and
qualifications of the experts and laboratories.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Designated person” means a person who is:
(1) Properly trained to take samples or specimens for tests
for the typing of blood and genetic identification; and
(2) Designated by an enforcing authority to take such
samples or specimens.
(b) “Enforcing authority” means the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services of the Department of Health and Human
Services, its designated representative, a district attorney or the
Attorney General when acting pursuant to NRS 425.380.
Sec. 62. NRS 126.141 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.141 1. On the basis of the information produced at the
pretrial hearing, the judge, [master] judicial officer appointed by a
court or referee conducting the hearing shall evaluate the probability
of determining the existence or nonexistence of the father and child
relationship in a trial and whether a judicial declaration of the
relationship would be in the best interest of the child. On the basis
of the evaluation, an appropriate recommendation for settlement
must be made to the parties, which may include any of the
following:
(a) That the action be dismissed with or without prejudice.
(b) That the matter be compromised by an agreement among the
alleged father, the mother and the child, in which the father and
child relationship is not determined but in which a defined economic
obligation, fully secured by payment or otherwise, is undertaken by
the alleged father in favor of the child and, if appropriate, in favor of
the mother, subject to approval by the judge, [master] judicial
officer or referee conducting the hearing. In reviewing the
obligation undertaken by the alleged father in a compromise
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
agreement, the judge, [master] judicial officer or referee conducting
the hearing shall consider the best interest of the child, discounted
by the improbability, as it appears to him or her, of establishing the
alleged father’s paternity or nonpaternity of the child in a trial of the
action. In the best interest of the child, the court may order that
the alleged father’s identity be kept confidential. In that case, the
court may designate a person or agency to receive from the alleged
father and disburse on behalf of the child all amounts paid by the
alleged father in fulfillment of obligations imposed on the alleged
father.
(c) That the alleged father voluntarily acknowledge his paternity
of the child.
2. If the parties accept a recommendation made in accordance
with subsection 1, judgment may be entered accordingly.
3. If a party refuses to accept a recommendation made under
subsection 1 and blood tests or tests for genetic identification have
not been taken, the court shall require the parties to submit to blood
tests or tests for genetic identification, if practicable. Thereafter the
judge, [master] judicial officer or referee shall make an appropriate
final recommendation. If a party refuses to accept the final
recommendation, the action must be set for trial.
4. The guardian ad litem may accept or refuse to accept a
recommendation under this section.
5. The pretrial hearing may be terminated and the action set for
trial if the judge, [master] judicial officer or referee conducting the
hearing finds unlikely that all parties would accept a
recommendation he or she might make under subsection 1 or 3.
Sec. 63. NRS 126.143 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.143 After an action is set for trial pursuant to NRS
126.141, the judge, [master] judicial officer appointed by a court or
referee shall, upon the motion of a party, issue an order providing
for the temporary support of the child pending the resolution of the
trial if the judge, [master] judicial officer or referee determines that
there is clear and convincing evidence that the party against whom
the order is issued is the father of the child.
Sec. 64. NRS 128.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
128.100 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in
any proceeding for terminating parental rights, or any rehearing or
appeal thereon, or any proceeding for restoring parental rights, the
court may appoint an attorney to represent the child as his or her
counsel. The child may be represented by an attorney at all stages of
any proceedings for terminating parental rights. If the child is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
represented by an attorney, the attorney has the same authority and
rights as an attorney representing a party to the proceedings.
2. In any proceeding for the termination of parental rights to a
child who has been placed outside of his or her home pursuant to
chapter 432B of NRS, or any rehearing or appeal thereon, or any
proceeding for restoring parental rights to such a child, the court
shall appoint an attorney to represent the child as his or her counsel.
The child shall be deemed to be a party to any proceeding described
in this section and must be represented by an attorney at all stages of
such proceedings. The attorney representing the child has the same
authority and rights as an attorney representing any other party to
the proceedings.
3. If the parent or parents of the child desire to be represented
by counsel, but are indigent, the court may appoint an attorney for
them.
4. Each attorney appointed under the provisions of this section
is entitled to the same compensation and expenses [from the county
as provided in NRS 7.125 and 7.135] for all time reasonably spent
on the proceedings and payment for all expenses reasonably
incurred from the proceedings, including, without limitation, time
spent and expenses incurred for preparation, hearings and
meetings. Such compensation must be paid at a rate not less than
the lowest rate paid to attorneys appointed to represent persons
charged with [crimes.] a felony in the same jurisdiction.
5. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed
indigent if:
(a) The person has a household income that is less than 200
percent of the federally designated level signifying poverty;
(b) The person is receiving federal assistance through federal
programs, including, without limitation, Medicaid, Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
or disability insurance benefits under the federal Social Security
Act;
(c) The person resides in public housing; or
(d) Hiring counsel would pose a financial hardship to the
person or his or her child or hinder the ability of the person to
obtain services to facilitate reunification with his or her child.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Public housing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 315.021.
(b) “Supplemental Nutrition Assistance” means the program
established to provide persons of low income with an opportunity
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
to purchase a more nutritious diet pursuant to the Food Stamp Act
of 1977, 7 U.S.C. §§ 2011 et seq., as amended.
(c) “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families” means the
program established to provide temporary assistance for needy
families pursuant to Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
§§ 601 et seq., and other provisions of that act relating to
temporary assistance for needy families.
Sec. 65. NRS 129.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
129.080 Any minor who is at least 16 years of age, who is
married or living apart from his or her parents or legal guardian, and
who is a resident of the county, may petition the juvenile court of
that county for a decree of emancipation. The district court may
refer the petition to a [master] judicial officer appointed pursuant to
title 5 of NRS or chapter 432B of NRS.
Sec. 66. NRS 130.102 is hereby amended to read as follows:
130.102 1. The district court and, within the limitations of
authority granted pursuant to NRS 3.405, 125.005 or 425.381 to
425.3852, inclusive, a [master] judicial officer or referee appointed
pursuant to any of those sections, are the tribunals of this State.
2. The support enforcement agency of this State may include,
without limitation, a court, a district attorney, a law enforcement
agency or the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 67. Chapter 159A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Judicial officer” means a person who is appointed to act as a
judicial officer of the court.
Sec. 68. NRS 159A.013 is hereby amended to read as follows:
159A.013 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 159A.014 to
159A.0265, inclusive, and section 67 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 69. NRS 159A.061 is hereby amended to read as follows:
159A.061 1. The parents of a proposed protected minor, or
either parent, if qualified and suitable, are preferred over all others
for appointment as guardian for the person or estate or person and
estate of the proposed protected minor. The appointment of a parent
as guardian for the person or estate of a proposed protected minor
must not conflict with a valid order for custody of the proposed
protected minor.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a parent of a
proposed protected minor files a petition seeking appointment as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
guardian for the proposed protected minor, the parent is presumed to
be suitable to serve as guardian for the proposed protected minor.
3. In determining whether the parents of a proposed protected
minor, or either parent, or any other person who seeks appointment
as guardian for the proposed protected minor is qualified and
suitable, the court shall consider, if applicable and without
limitation:
(a) Which parent has physical custody of the proposed protected
minor;
(b) The ability of the parents, parent or other person to provide
for the basic needs of the proposed protected minor, including,
without limitation, food, shelter, clothing and medical care, taking
into consideration any special needs of the proposed protected
minor;
(c) Whether the parents, parent or other person has engaged in
the habitual use of alcohol or any controlled substance during the
previous 6 months, except the use of cannabis in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 678C of NRS;
(d) Whether the parents, parent or other person has been
convicted of a crime of moral turpitude, a crime involving domestic
violence or a crime involving the abuse, neglect, exploitation,
isolation or abandonment of a child, his or her spouse, his or her
parent or any other adult;
(e) Whether the parents, parent or other person has been
convicted in this State or any other jurisdiction of a felony; and
(f) Whether the parents, parent or other person has engaged in
one or more acts of domestic violence against the proposed
protected minor, a parent of the proposed protected minor or any
other person who resides with the proposed protected minor.
4. A parent of a proposed protected minor is presumed to be
unsuitable to care for the proposed protected minor if:
(a) The parent is unable to provide for any or all of the basic
needs of the proposed protected minor, including, without
limitation:
(1) Food;
(2) Shelter;
(3) Clothing;
(4) Medical care; and
(5) Education;
(b) Because of action or inaction, the parent poses a significant
safety risk of either physical or emotional danger to the proposed
protected minor; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
(c) The proposed protected minor has not been in the care,
custody and control of the parent for the 6 months immediately
preceding the filing of the petition. The presumption created by this
paragraph is a rebuttable presumption.
5. Subject to the preference set forth in subsection 1 and except
as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the court shall appoint as
guardian the qualified person who is most suitable and is willing to
serve.
6. In determining which qualified person is most suitable, the
court shall, in addition to considering any applicable factors set forth
in subsections 2, 3 and 4, give consideration, among other factors,
to:
(a) Any nomination of a guardian for the proposed protected
minor contained in a will or other written instrument executed by a
parent of the proposed protected minor.
(b) Any request made by the proposed protected minor, if he or
she is 14 years of age or older, for the appointment of a person as
guardian for the proposed protected minor.
(c) The relationship by blood or adoption of the proposed
guardian to the proposed protected minor. In considering
preferences of appointment, the court may consider relatives of the
half blood equally with those of the whole blood. The court may
consider relatives in the following order of preference:
(1) Parent.
(2) Adult sibling.
(3) Grandparent.
(4) Uncle or aunt.
(d) Any recommendation made by a [master of the court]
judicial officer or special [master] judicial officer pursuant to
NRS 159A.0615.
(e) Any recommendation made by:
(1) An agency which provides child welfare services, an
agency which provides child protective services or a similar agency;
or
(2) A guardian ad litem or court appointed special advocate
who represents the proposed protected minor.
(f) Any request for the appointment of any other interested
person that the court deems appropriate.
7. The court may award temporary guardianship pursuant to
this section, supported by findings of suitability, pending a trial or
evidentiary hearing if that appointment is supported by findings.
8. Notwithstanding the presumption set forth in subsection 4,
in the event of competing petitions for the appointment of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 56 –
guardianship of a proposed protected minor, any finding of
unsuitability of a parent of the proposed protected minor must be
found by clear and convincing evidence after a hearing on the merits
or an evidentiary hearing.
9. In determining whether to appoint a guardian of the person
or estate of a proposed protected minor and who should be
appointed, the court must always act in the best interests of the
proposed protected minor.
10. A court shall not refuse to appoint a person as a guardian of
the person or estate of a proposed protected minor solely because
the person:
(a) Is deaf, is blind or has another physical disability; or
(b) Is the holder of a valid registry identification card.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Agency which provides child welfare services” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 432B.030.
(b) “Blind” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 426.082.
(c) “Holder of a valid registry identification card” means a
person who holds a valid registry identification card as defined in
NRS 678C.080 that identifies the person as:
(1) Exempt from state prosecution for engaging in the
medical use of cannabis; or
(2) A designated primary caregiver as defined in
NRS 678C.040.
Sec. 70. NRS 159A.0615 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
159A.0615 1. If the court determines that a minor may be in
need of a guardian, the court may order the appointment of a [master
of the court] judicial officer or a special [master] judicial officer
from among the members of the State Bar of Nevada to conduct a
hearing to identify the person most qualified and suitable to serve as
guardian for the proposed protected minor.
2. Not later than 5 calendar days after the date of the hearing,
the [master of the court] judicial officer or special [master] judicial
officer shall prepare and submit to the court a recommendation
regarding which person is most qualified and suitable to serve as
guardian for the proposed protected minor.
3. A court may designate, by rule or order, a different title to
a person appointed as a judicial officer or special judicial officer
so long as the title does not include the term “master.”
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 57 –
Sec. 71. NRS 159A.0617 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
159A.0617 If the court or a [master of the court] judicial
officer or special [master appointed pursuant to NRS 159A.0615]
judicial officer finds that a parent or other relative, teacher, friend or
neighbor of a proposed protected minor or any other interested
person:
1. Has a personal interest in the well-being of the proposed
protected minor; or
2. Possesses information that is relevant to the determination of
who should serve as guardian for the proposed protected minor,
 the court or a [master of the court] judicial officer or special
[master appointed pursuant to NRS 159A.0615] judicial officer may
allow the person to testify at any hearing held pursuant to this
chapter to determine the person most qualified and suitable to serve
as guardian for the proposed protected minor.
Sec. 72. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master , judicial officer appointed
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 58 –
by a court or referee, including a person acting pro tempore in a
capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(10) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, a
homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical
therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 59 –
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a participant in a
program of training to provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
(j) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(k) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(l) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 60 –
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 61 –
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 73. NRS 200.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.481 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” means any willful and unlawful use of force or
violence upon the person of another.
(b) “Child” means a person less than 18 years of age.
(c) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard, matron or other correctional officer of a
city or county jail or detention facility;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master , judicial officer appointed
by a court or referee, including, without limitation, a person acting
pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 62 –
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(10) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.471.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Strangulation” means intentionally applying sufficient
pressure to another person to make it difficult or impossible for the
person to breathe, including, without limitation, applying pressure to
the neck, throat or windpipe that may prevent or hinder breathing or
reduce the intake of air, or applying any pressure to the neck on
either side of the windpipe, but not the windpipe itself, to stop the
flow of blood to the brain via the carotid arteries.
(j) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
(k) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(l) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(m) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 200.485, a person
convicted of a battery, other than a battery committed by an adult
upon a child which constitutes child abuse, shall be punished:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 63 –
(a) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and no
substantial bodily harm to the victim results, except under
circumstances where a greater penalty is provided in this section or
NRS 197.090, for a misdemeanor.
(b) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and
either substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the battery is
committed by strangulation, for a category C felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) If:
(1) The battery is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who was performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event;
(2) The officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official
suffers substantial bodily harm or the battery is committed by
strangulation; and
(3) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the battery:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who is performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, except under circumstances where a
greater penalty is provided in this section.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 64 –
(e) If the battery is committed with the use of a deadly weapon,
and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(f) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, without the use of
a deadly weapon, whether or not substantial bodily harm results and
whether or not the battery is committed by strangulation, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years.
(g) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, with the use of a
deadly weapon, and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years.
Sec. 74. NRS 247.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.540 1. The following persons may request that the
personal information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS
247.520 that is contained in the records of a county recorder be kept
confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master or judicial officer in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 65 –
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive.
(n) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive, who was killed
in the performance of his or her duties.
(o) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been issued
pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 247.520 that is contained in the
records of a county recorder be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 66 –
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(e) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(f) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 75. NRS 250.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.140 1. The following persons may request that personal
information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS 250.120 that is
contained in the records of a county assessor be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master or judicial officer in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 67 –
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive.
(n) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive, who was killed
in the performance of his or her duties.
(o) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been issued
pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 250.120 that is contained in the
records of a county assessor be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 68 –
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(e) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(f) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 76. NRS 293.908 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.908 1. The following persons may request that personal
information contained in the records of the Secretary of State or a
county or city clerk be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master or judicial officer in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possess specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 69 –
(m) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive.
(n) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive, who was killed
in the performance of his or her duties.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(e) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(f) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 77. NRS 481.091 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.091 1. The following persons may request that the
Department display an alternate address on the person’s driver’s
license, commercial driver’s license or identification card:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master or judicial officer in this State.
(d) Any clerk of the court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any prosecutor who as part of his or her normal job
responsibilities prosecutes persons for:
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 70 –
(f) Any state or county public defender who as part of his or her
normal job responsibilities defends persons for:
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
(g) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(h) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(i) Any county manager in this State.
(j) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(k) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by the county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(l) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to (k), inclusive.
(m) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to (k), inclusive, who was killed
in the performance of his or her duties.
(n) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been issued
pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. A person who wishes to have an alternate address displayed
on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license or
identification card pursuant to this section must submit to the
Department satisfactory proof:
(a) That he or she is a person described in subsection 1; and
(b) Of the person’s address of principal residence and mailing
address, if different from the address of principal residence.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 71 –
3. A person who obtains a driver’s license, commercial driver’s
license or identification card that displays an alternate address
pursuant to this section may subsequently submit a request to the
Department to have his or her address of principal residence
displayed on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license
or identification card instead of the alternate address.
4. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 78. NRS 483.443 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.443 1. The Department shall, upon receiving notification
from a district attorney or other public agency collecting support for
children pursuant to NRS 425.510 that a court has determined that a
person:
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a
proceeding to establish paternity or to establish or enforce an
obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children,
 send a written notice to that person that his or her driver’s license
is subject to suspension.
2. The notice must include:
(a) The reason for the suspension of the license;
(b) The information set forth in subsections 3, 5 and 6; and
(c) Any other information the Department deems necessary.
3. If a person who receives a notice pursuant to subsection 1
does not, within 30 days after receiving the notice, comply with the
subpoena or warrant or satisfy the arrearage as required in NRS
425.510, the Department shall suspend the license without providing
the person with an opportunity for a hearing.
4. The Department shall suspend immediately the license of a
defendant if so ordered pursuant to NRS 62B.420 or 484A.7047.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 72 –
5. The Department shall reinstate the driver’s license of a
person whose license was suspended pursuant to this section if it
receives:
(a) A notice from any of the following:
(1) The district attorney or other public agency pursuant to
NRS 425.510 that the person has complied with the subpoena or
warrant or has satisfied the arrearage pursuant to that section.
(2) A traffic commissioner, referee, hearing master, judicial
officer appointed by a court, municipal judge, justice of the peace
or district judge, as applicable, that a delinquency for which the
suspension was ordered pursuant to NRS 484A.7047 has been
discharged.
(3) A judge of the juvenile court that an unsatisfied civil
judgment for which the suspension was ordered pursuant to NRS
62B.420 has been satisfied; and
(b) Payment of the fee for reinstatement of a suspended license
prescribed in NRS 483.410.
6. The Department shall not require a person whose driver’s
license was suspended pursuant to this section to submit to the tests
and other requirements which are adopted by regulation pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 483.495 as a condition of the reinstatement of
the license.
Sec. 79. NRS 609.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
609.245 Every person who employs and every parent, guardian
or other person having the care, custody or control of such child,
who permits to be employed, by another, any child under the age of
14 years at any labor whatever, in or in connection with any store,
shop, factory, mine or any inside employment not connected with
farmwork, housework or employment as a performer in a motion
picture, without the written permission for the employment signed
by a judge of the district court of the county of the child’s residence,
or signed by a juvenile [master,] judicial officer, referee or
probation officer authorized to sign such a permit by a judge of the
district court of the county of the child’s residence, is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 80. The amendatory provisions of sections 30 and 64 of
this act do not apply to any proceedings that began before January 1,
2026.
Sec. 81. 1. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer whose name is changed pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 73 –
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
whose name has been changed pursuant to the provisions of this act
to another officer are binding upon the officer to which the
responsibility for the administration of the provisions of the contract
or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts and other
agreements may be enforced by the officer to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the contract
or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer whose name has been
changed pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer
remains in effect as if taken by the officer to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 82. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 83. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 82, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)